Utah statutes.
58-63-310.   Interim permits.

(1)  The division may issue an interim permit to an applicant for licensure as an armed private security officer, armored car security officer, or unarmed private security officer upon receipt of a complete application for licensure in accordance with Section 58-63-302.

(2) (a)  Each interim permit expires 90 days after it is issued or on the date on which the applicant is issued a license, whichever is earlier.

(b)  The division may reissue an interim permit if the delay in approving a license is beyond the control or influence of the interim permit holder.

(3)  An interim permit holder may engage in the scope of practice defined for the license classification that the interim permit holder is seeking.

